Hawaii statutes.
§205A-62 Duties and responsibilities
of the lead agency. The lead agency shall have the following duties and
responsibilities:

(1) Coordinate overall implementation of the plan,
giving special consideration to the plan's priority recommendations;

(2) Review and periodically update the plan;

(3) Coordinate the development of state agency work
plans to implement the ocean resources management plan. The work plans shall
be revised on a biennial basis and coordinated with the budget process. State
agencies with responsibilities relating to marine and coastal zone management
include but are not limited to:

(A) The department of agriculture;

(B) The department of business, economic
development, and tourism;

(C) The department of defense;

(D) The department of health;

(E) The department of land and natural
resources;

(F) The department of public safety;

(G) The department of transportation; and

(H) The University of Hawaii;

(4) Ensure that state agency work plans are closely
coordinated with the work plans of relevant federal and county agencies;

(5) Analyze, resolve conflicts between, and
prioritize, in cooperation with relevant agencies and as part of the work plan
development process, the sector-specific recommendations included in the plan;

(6) Coordinate exclusive economic zone and other
marine-related issues with state and county agencies;

(7) Provide technical assistance to the agencies on
policy and issue-related matters regarding marine and coastal resources
management;

(8) Coordinate marine and coastal education
activities; and

(9) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out
the purposes of this part. [L 1995, c 104, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 158, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next